New Mexico, session 2026, SB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Public School Code is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] HIGH SCHOOL WATER MANAGEMENT AND CONSERVATION PROGRAM--PILOT PROJECT--REPORTING AND EVALUATION.-- A. The "high school water management and conservation program" is created as a two-year pilot project that creates a one-credit, elective high school course to study the feasibility of providing practical environmental education that prepares high school students for careers in water management and conservation. B. The department shall: (1) administer the high school water management and conservation program and develop a suitable curriculum for the program in collaboration with the higher education department, the department of health, the state engineer and Indian nations, tribes and pueblos; (2) determine the criteria and procedures for selecting three high schools to participate in the program; provided that the high schools shall be selected from one class A county, one class B high valuation county and one class B low valuation county; (3) establish reporting and evaluation requirements for the participating schools, including student and program assessments; and (4) provide interim and final reports annually to the legislature and the governor on the efficacy of the program. C. The department may use up to four percent of any appropriation made by the legislature for the high school water management and conservation program for professional development for participating educators and department administrative costs." SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 for curriculum development and operational expenses, including teacher salaries, for the high school water management and conservation program. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. - 3 -